District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2833

Livery stables.

Repealed.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 627, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 35
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 557, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I,§ 104(u), 23 DCR 2461
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(29), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2833.
1973 Ed., § 47-2335.